Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 85 Lindsay Ann Burke Act

16-85-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Lindsay Ann Burke Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 490, § 1.

16-85-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines and declares that when a student is a victim of dating violence, his or her academic life suffers and his or her safety at school is jeopardized. The general assembly therefore finds that a policy to create an environment free of dating violence shall be a part of each school district. It is the intent of the general assembly to enact legislation that would require each school district to establish a policy for responding to incidents of dating violence and to provide dating violence education to students, parents, staff, faculty and administrators, in order to prevent dating violence and to address incidents involving dating violence. All students have a right to work and study in a safe, supportive environment that is free from harassment, intimidation and violence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 490, § 1.